Missouri, session 2026, HB3368.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapters 208 and 376, RSMo, are amended by adding thereto two new
sections, to be known as sections 208.667 and 376.1170, to read as follows:
208.667. 1. Subject to appropriation, there is hereby established within the
department of social services a state assistance program to cover the cost of vasectomies
for uninsured residents of this state.
2. Every male person who is a resident of this state and who does not have
employer-sponsored health insurance coverage or coverage under a public health
insurance program shall be eligible for full coverage of the cost of a vasectomy under the
program. Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, a person's
income or resources shall not be considered to determine eligibility for the program.
The department of social services shall establish by rule an application process to verify
eligibility for the program.
3. The department of social services shall not require a finding of medical
necessity for the vasectomy or establish any other restrictions on eligibility other than
those restrictions specified in this section.
4. The department of social services shall make payments for vasectomies to
appropriate medical providers on behalf of persons eligible under this section on the
basis of the reasonable cost of the vasectomies as defined and determined by the
department by rule.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3368 2
5. The program created under this section is subject to the annual appropriation
of funds by the general assembly. Benefits are limited by moneys so appropriated.
6. (1) There is hereby created in the state treasury the "Vasectomy Fund",
which shall consist of moneys appropriated to it by the general assembly and any gift,
contributions, grants, or bequests from federal, private, or other sources. The state
treasurer shall be custodian of the fund. In accordance with sections 30.170 and 30.180,
the state treasurer may approve disbursements. The fund shall be a dedicated fund and,
upon appropriation, moneys in this fund shall be used solely for payments for
vasectomies provided through the program created under this section and for
administrative expenses associated with the program.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary, any moneys
remaining in the fund at the end of the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the
general revenue fund.
(3) The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the fund in the same manner as
other funds are invested. Any interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be
credited to the fund.
7. The department of social services shall promulgate rules to implement the
provisions of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section
536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall become
effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and,
if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any
of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to
delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held
unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or
adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
376.1170. 1. As used in this section, the terms "health carrier" and "health
benefit plan" shall have the same meanings given to the terms in section 376.1350.
2. Each health carrier or health benefit plan that offers or issues health benefit
plans that are delivered, issued for delivery, continued, or renewed in this state on or
after January 1, 2027, shall provide coverage for vasectomies.
3. A health carrier or health benefit plan shall not require a finding of medical
necessity for the vasectomy or establish any other restrictions on eligibility for the
coverage required under this section.
4. Health care services required by this section shall not be subject to any greater
deductible or co-payment than any other health care service provided by the health
benefit plan.

HB 3368 3
5. The provisions of this section shall not apply to a supplemental insurance
policy, including a life care contract, accident-only policy, specified disease policy,
hospital policy providing a fixed daily benefit only, Medicare supplement policy, long-
term care policy, short-term major medical policy of six months' or less duration, or any
other supplemental policy as determined by the director of the department of commerce
and insurance.
✔